Washington statutes.
RCW 12.12.010

Continuances limited.

When the pleadings of the party shall have taken place, the justice shall, upon the application of either party, and sufficient cause be shown on oath, continue the case for any time not exceeding sixty days. If the continuance be on account of absence of testimony, it shall be for such reasonable time as will enable the party to procure such testimony, and shall be at the cost of the party applying therefor, unless otherwise ordered by the justice; and in all other respects shall be governed by the law applicable to continuance in the superior court.

[ 1957 c 89 s 12; Code 1881 s 1769; 1873 p 346 s 68; 1854 p 232 s 56; RRS s 1847.]